Hawaii, session 2025, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 249, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§249-     Electronic license plates.  Each county may adopt rules, including the assessment of any reasonable fees, authorizing the use of an electronic license plate in lieu of one or both physical license plates furnished by the director of finance; provided that: (1)  The displayed electronic license plate shall comply with all the requirements of sections 249-9 and 249-12, as applicable; (2)  The owner of the vehicle shall be solely responsible for purchasing the electronic license plate display device from an authorized manufacturer; and (3)  The electronic license plate shall not display a plate number other than the number registered to the vehicle." SECTION 2.  Chapter 286, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§286-     License plate flipping devices; prohibited.  (a)  No person shall operate a motor vehicle with, possess, purchase, install, sell, offer for sale, or otherwise distribute a license plate flipping device. (b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any person who violates this section shall be fined no less than $750 but no more than $1,000 for each separate violation. (c) For the purpose of this section "license plate flipping device" means a manual, electric, or mechanical device designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle that: (1)  Switches between two or more license plates for the purpose of allowing a motor vehicle operator to change the license plate displayed on the operator's motor vehicle; or (2)  Hides a license plate from view by flipping the license plate so that the plate number is not visible. §286-     Intentional obscuring of a license plate prohibited.  Intentionally obscuring a vehicle's license plate through the use of a cover or shield shall be prohibited.  Any violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of no less than $500 but no more than $1,000 for each offense." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.